Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.020

Application of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW.

The provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW shall apply to each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more: PROVIDED, That any city having a population of more than four hundred thousand may by resolution of its legislative body elect to continue to operate a municipal court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35.20 RCW, as if chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW had never been enacted: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a city elects to continue its municipal court pursuant to this section, the number of district judges allocated to the county in RCW 3.34.010 shall be reduced by two and the number of full time district judges allocated by RCW 3.34.020 to the district in which the city is situated shall also be reduced by two. The provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW may be made applicable to any county with a population of less than two hundred ten thousand upon a majority vote of its county legislative authority.

[ 1991 c 363 s 4; 1987 c 202 s 110; 1961 c 299 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Municipal courts in cities of over four hundred thousand: Chapter 35.20 RCW.